src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON l31_2 ! simpil
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>il  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>lan # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lum # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ils # ;
 +A:l Pl_Msc1 ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>il  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>la  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>lar # ;
 +A:l Pl_Fem1 ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ilt # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ilt # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>lum # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ils # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>il  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>il  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>lum # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>la  # ;
 +A:l Pos_Def ;
 +A:l Comp_Ari ;
 
LEXICON l32 ! búgvin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl32 ;
LEXICON zl32 ! búgvin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>gvin  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>nan   # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>num   # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>gvins # ;
 Pl_Msc3 ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>gvin	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>na    # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>nari  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>nar   # ;
 Pl_Fem3 ; 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>gvið	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>gvið	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>num   # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>gvins # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>gvin	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>gvin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na	 # ;
 :n Pos_Def  ;
 :n Comp_Ari ;

LEXICON l33 ! gamal
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl33 ;
LEXICON zl33
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:amal	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:amlan	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:omlum   # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:amals	 # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:amlir   # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:amlar   # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:omlum   # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:amla 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:omul    # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:amla 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:amlari  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:amlar 	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:amlar   # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:amlar   # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:omlum	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:amla	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:amalt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:amalt	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:omlum   # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:amals	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:omul	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:omul 	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:omlum   # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:amla	 # ;
 :aml Pos_Def2 ;
 


LEXICON l34 ! dottin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl34 ;
LEXICON zl34 ! dottin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:tin  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:tins # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:tin  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:tið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:tið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:tins # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:tin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:tin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 :%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_2 ! dossin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:sin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:sins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:sin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:sið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:sið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:sins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:sin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:sin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_3 ! errin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:rin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:rins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:rin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:rið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:rið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:rins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:rin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:rin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_4 ! hyggin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:gin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:gins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:gin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:gið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:gið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:gins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:gin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:gin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_5 ! sloppin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +A+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:pin  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:pins # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:pin  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:pið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:pið  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:pins # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:pin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:pin  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_6 ! funnin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl34_6 ;
LEXICON zl34_6 ! funnin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:nin  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:nins # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:nin  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:nið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:nið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:nins # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:nin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:nin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 :%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_7 ! fallin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl34_7 ;

LEXICON zl34_7
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:lin  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:nan  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:lins # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:nir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:lin  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:na   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:nari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:nar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:lið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:lið  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:lins # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:lin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:lin  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:num  # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:na	  # ;
 +A:%>n Pos_Def  			;

LEXICON l34_8 ! drukkin
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
+A: zl34_8 ;
