src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
gamal:g l33 ;
dottin:dot l34 ;
sprottin:sprot l34 ;
avrógvin:avró l32 ;
átrúgvin:átrú l32 ;
blúgvin:blú l32 ;
brestbúgvin:brest#bú l32 ;
fátrúgvin:fátrú l32 ;
fullbúgvin:full#bú l32 ;
gróðrarbúgvin:gróðrar#bú l32 ;
havrógvin:havró l32 ;
herbúgvin:her#bú l32 ;
kynbúgvin:kyn#bú l32 ;
mistrúgvin:mistrú l32 ;
nærrógvin:nærró l32 ;
órógvin:óró l32 ;
rangtrúgvin:rangtrú l32 ;
silvurbúgvin:silvur#bú l32 ;
snúgvin:snú l32 ;
tortrúgvin:tortrú l32 ;
uppsnúgvin:uppsnú l32 ;
vanabúgvin:vana#bú l32 ;
tættbúgvin:tætt#bú l32 ;
áragamal:ára#g l33 ;
ársgamal:árs#g l33 ;
daggamal:dag#g l33 ;
deyðgamal:deyð#g l33 ;
eldgamal:eld#g l33 ;
elligamal:elli#g l33 ;
ergamal:er#g l33 ;
hálvgamal:hálv#g l33 ;
hvøkkin:hvøk l34_8 ;
javngamal:javn#g l33 ;
náttargamal:náttar#g l33 ;
skúlagamal:skúla#g l33 ;
træveturgamal:træ#vetur#g l33 ;
trøllgamal:trøll#g l33 ;
tvæveturgamal:tvæ#vetur#g l33 ;
úrgamal:úr#g l33 ;
veturgamal:vetur#g l33 ;
ævigamal:ævi#g l33 ;
áfallin:áfal l34_7 ;
áhittin:áhit l34 ;
bergfallin:bergfal l34_7 ;
brellin:brel l34_7 ;
brettin:bret l34 ;
dagfallin:dagfal l34_7 ;
deyðadrukkin:deyðadruk l34_8 ;
dittin:dit l34 ;
dossin:dos l34_2 ;
drukkin:druk l34_8 ;
eftirleggin:eftirleg l34_4 ;
eftirskettin:eftirsket l34 ;
eiggin:eig l34_4 ;
errin:er l34_3 ;
funnin:fun l34_6 ;
eyðfunnin:eyðfun l34_6 ;
eyðvunnin:eyðvun l34_6 ;
fjeppin:fjep l34_5 ;
fjøppin:fjøp l34_5 ;
fløgurunnin:fløgurun l34_6 ;
foyggin:foyg l34_4 ;
fólkaskýggin:fólkaskýg l34_4 ;
framsíggin:framsíg l34_4 ;
framskyggin:framskyg l34_4 ;
fráfallin:fráfal l34_7 ;
frættin:fræt l34 ;
fyrihyggin:fyrihyg l34_4 ;
fyrstrunnin:fyrstrun l34_6 ;
gessin:ges l34_2 ;
grannsíggin:grannsíg l34_4 ;
harðvunnin:harðvun l34_6 ;
hálvdrukkin:hálvdruk l34_8 ;
heiðursvunnin:heiðursvun l34_6 ;
heimaspunnin:heimaspun l34_6 ;
heppin:hep l34_5 ;
hippin:hip l34_5 ;
hittin:hit l34 ;
hóreiggin:hóreig l34_4 ;
hugfallin:hugfal l34_7 ;
hveppin:hvep l34_5 ;
hyggin:hyg l34_4 ;
illvíggin:illvíg l34_4 ;
innfallin:innfal l34_7 ;
innsíggin:innsíg l34_4 ;
innsokkin:innsok l34_8 ;
íminnin:ímin l34_6 ;
ísstokkin:ísstok l34_8 ;
kálvfallin:kálvfal l34_7 ;
kássin:kás l34_2 ;
klársíggin:klársíg l34_4 ;
kopphyggin:kopphyg l34_4 ;
krillillin:krillil l34_7 ;
krillin:kril l34_7 ;
kroppin:krop l34_5 ;
kveinin:kvei l34_6 ;
kvettin:kvet l34 ;
langríggin:langríg l34_4 ;
lukkudrukkin:lukkudruk l34_8 ;
lættvunnin:lættvun l34_6 ;
miðfirrin:miðfir l34_3 ;
moldrunnin:moldrun l34_6 ;
mótfallin:mótfal l34_7 ;
nýfikkin:nýfik l34_8 ;
nýfjeppin:nýfjep l34_5 ;
nýfjøppin:nýfjøp l34_5 ;
orðkvettin:orðkvet l34 ;
ovdrukkin:ovdruk l34_8 ;
ódrukkin:ódruk l34_8 ;
óforsíggin:óforsíg l34_4 ;
óheppin:óhep l34_5 ;
órinin:óri l34_6 ;
óskettin:ósket l34 ;
óskjøttin:óskjøt l34 ;
óskyggin:óskyg l34_4 ;
prettin:pret l34 ;
prippin:prip l34_5 ;
rakfallin:rakfal l34_7 ;
rittin:rit l34 ;
ríggin:ríg l34_4 ;
sjálvfunnin:sjálvfun l34_6 ;
sjálvvunnin:sjálvvun l34_6 ;
skettin:sket l34 ;
skoppin:skop l34_5 ;
skýggin:skýg l34_4 ;
snakkin:snak l34_8 ;
sterrin:ster l34_3 ;
stríggin:stríg l34_4 ;
støkkin:støk l34_8 ;
svøllin:svøl l34_7 ;
terrin:ter l34_3 ;
tilsíggin:tilsíg l34_4 ;
tortryggin:tortryg l34_4 ;
tráfikkin:tráfik l34_8 ;
trýggin:trýg l34_4 ;
tungvunnin:tungvun l34_6 ;
tykkin:tyk l34_8 ;
undanleggin:undanleg l34_4 ;
vanskettin:vansket l34 ;
vatnfirrin:vatnfir l34_3 ;
veggfellin:veggfel l34_7 ;
innerrin:inner l34_3 ;
maskinspunnin:maskinspun l34_6 ;
snerrin:sner l34_3 ;
tokkin:tok l34_8 ;
undanstøkkin:undanstøk l34_8 ;
avgamal:av#g l33 ;
uppfunnin:uppfun l34_6 ;
omandottin:omandot l34 ;
simpil:simp l31_2 ;
samal:s l33 ;
sokkin:sok l34_8 ;
stokkin:stok l34_8 ;
fallin:fal l34_7 ;
svollin:svol l34_7 ;
spunnin:spun l34_6 ;
vunnin:vun l34_6 ;
sloppin:slop l34_5 ;
grótgamal:grót#g l33 ;
aldagamal:alda#g l33 ;
aldargamal:aldar#g l33 ;
eftirsíggin:eftir#síg l34_4 ;
samansokkin:saman#sok l34_8 ;
sundurstokkin:sundur#stok l34_8 ;
úrstokkin:úr#stok l34_8 ;
avstokkin:av#stok l34_8 ;
burturfallin:burtur#fal l34_7 ;
niðurfallin:niður#fal l34_7 ;
avfallin:av#fal l34_7 ;
samansvollin:saman#svol l34_7 ;
íspunnin:í#spun l34_6 ;
upprunnin:upp#run l34_6 ;
útrunnin:út#run l34_6 ;
undansloppin:undan#slop l34_5 ;
uppsloppin:upp#slop l34_5 ;
inndottin:inn#dot l34 ;
burturdottin:burtur#dot l34 ;
niðurdottin:niður#dot l34 ;
avdottin:av#dot l34 ;
arvagrógvin:arva#gró l32 ;
grasgrógvin:gras#gró l32 ;
mosagrógvin:mosa#gró l32 ;
tonglagrógvin:tongla#gró l32 ;
